Wisconsin, session 2025, AB919.
do enact as follows:AB919,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB919,25Section 2. 20.155 (3) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB919,2,7620.155 (3) (d) Relocation reimbursement. As a continuing appropriation, the 7amounts in the schedule for providing reimbursements under s. 196.93.AB919,38Section 3. 196.93 of the statutes is created to read:AB919,2,99196.93 Relocation reimbursement. (1) In this section:AB919,2,1110(a) “Communications service facility” means a facility installed by a 11communications service provider.AB919,2,1512(b) “Communications service provider” means a cable service provider, video 13service provider, telecommunications carrier, telecommunications utility, or 14Internet service provider that provides Internet service that is described in s. 15196.504 (1) (c) 1. and 2.AB919,2,1916(2) The commission shall reimburse communications service providers that 17are required by an agency, as defined in s. 13.172 (1), city, village, town, or county to 18relocate communications service facilities located within a public right-of-way for 19the costs associated with relocating the facilities.AB919,420Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB919,3,221(1) Relocation reimbursements; onetime funding. Notwithstanding s. 2216.42 (1) (e), in submitting information under s. 16.42 for purposes of the 2027-29 23biennial budget bill, the public service commission shall submit information 1concerning the appropriation under s. 20.155 (3) (d) as though the total amount 2appropriated under s. 20.155 (3) (d) for the 2026-27 fiscal year was zero.AB919,3,33